test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-fem-a_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # skoolo o-stem
    skoolo+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: skoola
    skoolo+N+Fem+Sg+Obl: skoolas
    skoolo+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: skoolake
    skoolo+N+Fem+Sg+Abl: skoolata
    skoolo+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: skoolaha
    skoolo+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: skoolako
    skoolo+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: skoolakiiro
    skoolo+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: skooli
    skoolo+N+Fem+Pl+Obl: skoolen
    skoolo+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: skoolenge
    skoolo+N+Fem+Pl+Abl: skoolenna
    skoolo+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: skoolensa
    skoolo+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: skoolengo
    skoolo+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: skoolengiiro
